sk_SK-lemma/sk_SK.aff
FLAG num
SFX 2103 Y 1
SFX 2103 0 ami .
PFX 2103 Y 1
PFX 2103 le ľ .
SFX 2104 Y 1
SFX 2104 ieť íme .
PFX 2104 Y 1
PFX 2104 0 po .
SFX 2105 Y 1
SFX 2105 ieť íte .
PFX 2105 Y 1
PFX 2105 0 po .
SFX 2106 Y 1
SFX 2106 eť a .
PFX 2106 Y 1
PFX 2106 0 po .
SFX 2107 Y 1
SFX 2107 ieť ím .
PFX 2107 Y 1
PFX 2107 0 po .
SFX 2108 Y 1
SFX 2108 ieť íš .
PFX 2108 Y 1
PFX 2108 0 po .
SFX 2109 Y 1
SFX 2109 ieť í .
PFX 2109 Y 1
PFX 2109 0 po .
SFX 2110 Y 1
SFX 2110 o 0 .
PFX 2110 Y 1
PFX 2110 l li .
SFX 2111 Y 1
SFX 2111 á 0 .
PFX 2111 Y 1
PFX 2111 l li .
SFX 2112 N 1
SFX 2112 ik kovi .
SFX 2113 N 1
SFX 2113 ido íd .
SFX 2114 Y 1
SFX 2114 zť ieme .
PFX 2114 Y 1
PFX 2114 l pol .
SFX 2115 Y 1
SFX 2115 zť iete .
PFX 2115 Y 1
PFX 2115 l pol .
SFX 2116 Y 1
SFX 2116 ť ú .
PFX 2116 Y 1
PFX 2116 li pol .
SFX 2117 Y 1
SFX 2117 zť iem .
PFX 2117 Y 1
PFX 2117 l pol .
SFX 2118 Y 1
SFX 2118 zť ieš .
PFX 2118 Y 1
PFX 2118 l pol .
SFX 2119 Y 1
SFX 2119 zť ie .
PFX 2119 Y 1
PFX 2119 l pol .
SFX 2120 Y 1
SFX 2120 zť iem .
PFX 2120 Y 1
PFX 2120 l l .
SFX 2121 Y 1
SFX 2121 zť ieš .
PFX 2121 Y 1
PFX 2121 l l .
SFX 2122 Y 1
SFX 2122 zť ie .
PFX 2122 Y 1
PFX 2122 l l .
SFX 2123 Y 1
SFX 2123 zť ieme .
PFX 2123 Y 1
PFX 2123 l l .
SFX 2124 Y 1
SFX 2124 zť iete .
PFX 2124 Y 1
PFX 2124 l l .
SFX 2125 Y 1
SFX 2125 ť ú .
PFX 2125 Y 1
PFX 2125 li l .
SFX 2126 Y 1
SFX 2126 ť 0 .
PFX 2126 Y 1
PFX 2126 li l .
SFX 2127 Y 1
SFX 2127 ť me .
PFX 2127 Y 1
PFX 2127 li l .
SFX 2128 Y 1
SFX 2128 ť te .
PFX 2128 Y 1
PFX 2128 li l .
SFX 2129 Y 1
SFX 2129 ť úc .
PFX 2129 Y 1
PFX 2129 li l .
SFX 2130 Y 1
SFX 2130 a 0 .
PFX 2130 Y 1
PFX 2130 li lí .
SFX 2131 N 1
SFX 2131 eň ňovi .
SFX 2132 N 1
SFX 2132 ono ôn .
SFX 2133 Y 1
SFX 2133 a 0 .
PFX 2133 Y 1
PFX 2133 lo lô .
SFX 2134 N 1
SFX 2134 ďka diek .
SFX 2135 N 1
SFX 2135 ož ži .
SFX 2136 N 1
SFX 2136 ož žou .
SFX 2137 N 1
SFX 2137 ož ží .
SFX 2138 N 1
SFX 2138 ož žiam .
SFX 2139 N 1
SFX 2139 ož žiach .
SFX 2140 N 1
SFX 2140 ož žami .
SFX 2141 N 1
SFX 2141 hať žem .
SFX 2142 N 1
SFX 2142 hať žeš .
SFX 2143 N 1
SFX 2143 hať že .
SFX 2144 N 1
SFX 2144 hať žeme .
SFX 2145 N 1
SFX 2145 hať žete .
SFX 2146 N 1
SFX 2146 hať žú .
SFX 2147 N 1
SFX 2147 hať ž .
SFX 2148 N 1
SFX 2148 hať žme .
SFX 2149 N 1
SFX 2149 hať žte .
SFX 2150 N 1
SFX 2150 hať žúc .
SFX 2151 N 1
SFX 2151 yko ýk .
SFX 2152 Y 1
SFX 2152 a 0 .
PFX 2152 Y 1
PFX 2152 ly lý .
SFX 2153 N 1
SFX 2153 ťa tence .
SFX 2154 N 1
SFX 2154 ťa teniec .
SFX 2155 N 1
SFX 2155 ťa tencom .
SFX 2156 N 1
SFX 2156 ťa tencoch .
SFX 2157 N 1
SFX 2157 ťa tencami .
SFX 2158 N 1
SFX 2158 aga ág .
SFX 2159 N 1
SFX 2159 esto iest .
SFX 2160 Y 1
SFX 2160 a 0 .
PFX 2160 Y 1
PFX 2160 ma má .
SFX 2161 N 1
SFX 2161 alý enší .
SFX 2162 N 1
SFX 2162 alý enšieho .
SFX 2163 N 1
SFX 2163 alý enšiemu .
SFX 2164 N 1
SFX 2164 alý enšom .
SFX 2165 N 1
SFX 2165 alý enším .
SFX 2166 N 1
SFX 2166 alý enších .
SFX 2167 N 1
SFX 2167 alý enšími .
SFX 2168 N 1
SFX 2168 alý enšie .
SFX 2169 N 1
SFX 2169 alý enšia .
SFX 2170 N 1
SFX 2170 alý enšej .
SFX 2171 N 1
SFX 2171 alý enšiu .
SFX 2172 N 1
SFX 2172 alý enšou .
SFX 2173 Y 1
SFX 2173 alý jmenší .
PFX 2173 Y 1
PFX 2173 0 n .
SFX 2174 Y 1
SFX 2174 alý jmenšieho .
PFX 2174 Y 1
PFX 2174 0 n .
SFX 2175 Y 1
SFX 2175 alý jmenšiemu .
PFX 2175 Y 1
PFX 2175 0 n .
SFX 2176 Y 1
SFX 2176 alý jmenšom .
PFX 2176 Y 1
PFX 2176 0 n .
SFX 2177 Y 1
SFX 2177 alý jmenším .
PFX 2177 Y 1
PFX 2177 0 n .
SFX 2178 Y 1
SFX 2178 alý jmenších .
PFX 2178 Y 1
PFX 2178 0 n .
SFX 2179 Y 1
SFX 2179 alý jmenšími .
PFX 2179 Y 1
PFX 2179 0 n .
SFX 2180 Y 1
SFX 2180 alý jmenšie .
PFX 2180 Y 1
PFX 2180 0 n .
SFX 2181 Y 1
SFX 2181 alý jmenšia .
PFX 2181 Y 1
PFX 2181 0 n .
SFX 2182 Y 1
SFX 2182 alý jmenšej .
PFX 2182 Y 1
PFX 2182 0 n .
SFX 2183 Y 1
SFX 2183 alý jmenšiu .
PFX 2183 Y 1
PFX 2183 0 n .
SFX 2184 Y 1
SFX 2184 alý jmenšou .
PFX 2184 Y 1
PFX 2184 0 n .
SFX 2185 Y 1
SFX 2185 o 0 .
PFX 2185 Y 1
PFX 2185 ma má .
SFX 2186 N 1
SFX 2186 i ere .
SFX 2187 N 1
SFX 2187 i eri .
SFX 2188 N 1
SFX 2188 i erou .
SFX 2189 N 1
SFX 2189 i erí .
SFX 2190 N 1
SFX 2190 i eriam .
SFX 2191 N 1
SFX 2191 i eriach .
SFX 2192 N 1
SFX 2192 i erami .
SFX 2193 N 1
SFX 2193 imum ím .
SFX 2194 N 1
SFX 2194 rta ŕt .
SFX 2195 N 1
SFX 2195 ť tere .
SFX 2196 N 1
SFX 2196 ť teri .
SFX 2197 N 1
SFX 2197 ť terou .
SFX 2198 N 1
SFX 2198 ť terí .
SFX 2199 N 1
SFX 2199 ť teriam .
SFX 2200 N 1
SFX 2200 ť teriach .
SFX 2201 N 1
SFX 2201 ť terami .
SFX 2202 Y 1
SFX 2202 a 0 .
PFX 2202 Y 1
PFX 2202 m mi .
SFX 2203 N 1
SFX 2203 andum ánd .
SFX 2204 Y 1
SFX 2204 o 0 .
PFX 2204 Y 1
PFX 2204 m mi .
SFX 2205 N 1
SFX 2205 g mog .
SFX 2206 N 1
SFX 2206 iasť ätiem .
SFX 2207 N 1
SFX 2207 iasť ätieš .
SFX 2208 N 1
SFX 2208 iasť ätie .
SFX 2209 N 1
SFX 2209 iasť ätieme .
SFX 2210 N 1
SFX 2210 iasť ätiete .
SFX 2211 N 1
SFX 2211 iasť ätú .
SFX 2212 N 1
SFX 2212 iasť äť .
SFX 2213 N 1
SFX 2213 iasť äťme .
SFX 2214 N 1
SFX 2214 iasť äťte .
SFX 2215 N 1
SFX 2215 iasť ätúc .
SFX 2216 Y 1
SFX 2216 sť m .
PFX 2216 Y 1
PFX 2216 m met .
SFX 2217 Y 1
SFX 2217 sť š .
PFX 2217 Y 1
PFX 2217 m met .
SFX 2218 Y 1
SFX 2218 sť 0 .
PFX 2218 Y 1
PFX 2218 m met .
SFX 2219 Y 1
SFX 2219 sť me .
PFX 2219 Y 1
PFX 2219 m met .
SFX 2220 Y 1
SFX 2220 sť te .
PFX 2220 Y 1
PFX 2220 m met .
SFX 2221 N 1
SFX 2221 ni ňou .
SFX 2222 N 1
SFX 2222 i í .
SFX 2223 N 1
SFX 2223 ňa ieň .
SFX 2224 N 1
SFX 2224 aty iat .
SFX 2225 N 1
SFX 2225 inda índ .
SFX 2226 N 1
SFX 2226 í ých .
SFX 2227 N 1
SFX 2227 í ým .
SFX 2228 N 1
SFX 2228 í ými .
SFX 2229 Y 1
SFX 2229 ť m .
PFX 2229 Y 1
PFX 2229 m me .
SFX 2230 Y 1
SFX 2230 ť š .
PFX 2230 Y 1
PFX 2230 m me .
SFX 2231 Y 1
SFX 2231 ť 0 .
PFX 2231 Y 1
PFX 2231 m me .
SFX 2232 Y 1
SFX 2232 ť me .
PFX 2232 Y 1
PFX 2232 m me .
SFX 2233 Y 1
SFX 2233 ť te .
PFX 2233 Y 1
PFX 2233 m me .
SFX 2234 N 1
SFX 2234 mnoho viacej .
SFX 2235 N 1
SFX 2235 mnoho viac .
SFX 2236 Y 1
SFX 2236 oho ajviacej .
PFX 2236 Y 1
PFX 2236 m 0 .
SFX 2237 Y 1
SFX 2237 oho ajviac .
PFX 2237 Y 1
PFX 2237 m 0 .
SFX 2238 N 1
SFX 2238 yka ýk .
SFX 2239 N 1
SFX 2239 og gu .
SFX 2240 N 1
SFX 2240 og gom .
SFX 2241 N 1
SFX 2241 og gy .
SFX 2242 N 1
SFX 2242 og gov .
SFX 2243 N 1
SFX 2243 og goch .
SFX 2244 N 1
SFX 2244 og gami .
SFX 2245 Y 1
SFX 2245 a 0 .
PFX 2245 Y 1
PFX 2245 mr mŕ .
SFX 2246 N 1
SFX 2246 ik kovia .
SFX 2247 N 1
SFX 2247 rľa ŕľ .
SFX 2248 Y 1
SFX 2248 a 0 .
PFX 2248 Y 1
PFX 2248 mu mú .
SFX 2249 N 1
SFX 2249 my nás .
SFX 2250 Y 1
SFX 2250 y 0 .
PFX 2250 Y 1
PFX 2250 0 ná .
SFX 2251 Y 1
SFX 2251 y i .
PFX 2251 Y 1
PFX 2251 0 na .
SFX 2252 Y 1
SFX 2252 a 0 .
PFX 2252 Y 1
PFX 2252 my mý .
SFX 2253 N 1
SFX 2253 eľ ľou .
SFX 2254 N 1
SFX 2254 eľ lí .
SFX 2255 N 1
SFX 2255 eľ liam .
SFX 2256 N 1
SFX 2256 eľ liach .
SFX 2257 Y 1
SFX 2257 a 0 .
PFX 2257 Y 1
PFX 2257 m mie .
SFX 2258 N 1
SFX 2258 álo enej .
SFX 2259 Y 1
SFX 2259 álo enej .
PFX 2259 Y 1
PFX 2259 0 naj .
SFX 2260 N 1
SFX 2260 äso ias .
SFX 2261 N 1
SFX 2261 äta iat .
SFX 2262 N 1
SFX 2262 ôj ojom .
SFX 2263 N 1
SFX 2263 ôj ojím .
SFX 2264 N 1
SFX 2264 ôj oji .
SFX 2265 N 1
SFX 2265 ôj ojich .
SFX 2266 N 1
SFX 2266 ôj ojim .
SFX 2267 N 1
SFX 2267 ôj ojimi .
SFX 2268 N 1
SFX 2268 ôj oje .
SFX 2269 N 1
SFX 2269 ôj oja .
SFX 2270 N 1
SFX 2270 ôj ojej .
SFX 2271 N 1
SFX 2271 ôj oju .
SFX 2272 N 1
SFX 2272 ôj ojou .
SFX 2273 N 1
SFX 2273 vec ca .
SFX 2274 N 1
SFX 2274 vec cu .
SFX 2275 N 1
SFX 2275 vec ci .
SFX 2276 N 1
SFX 2276 vec com .
SFX 2277 N 1
SFX 2277 vec ce .
SFX 2278 N 1
SFX 2278 vec cov .
SFX 2279 N 1
SFX 2279 vec coch .
SFX 2280 N 1
SFX 2280 vec cami .
SFX 2281 N 1
SFX 2281 sť ď .
SFX 2282 N 1
SFX 2282 sť ďme .
SFX 2283 N 1
SFX 2283 sť ďte .
SFX 2284 N 1
SFX 2284 ísť išiel .
SFX 2285 N 1
SFX 2285 ísť išla .
SFX 2286 N 1
SFX 2286 ísť išlo .
SFX 2287 N 1
SFX 2287 ísť išli .
SFX 2288 N 1
SFX 2288 k če .
SFX 2289 N 1
SFX 2289 človek ľudia .
SFX 2290 N 1
SFX 2290 človek ľudí .
SFX 2291 N 1
SFX 2291 človek ľuďom .
SFX 2292 N 1
SFX 2292 človek ľuďoch .
SFX 2293 N 1
SFX 2293 človek ľuďmi .
SFX 2294 Y 1
SFX 2294 a 0 .
PFX 2294 Y 1
PFX 2294 na ná .
SFX 2295 N 1
SFX 2295 kať čú .
SFX 2296 N 1
SFX 2296 kať čúc .
SFX 2297 N 1
SFX 2297 chať šu .
SFX 2298 N 1
SFX 2298 chať šuc .
SFX 2299 N 1
SFX 2299 lať eliem .
SFX 2300 N 1
SFX 2300 lať elieš .
SFX 2301 N 1
SFX 2301 lať elie .
SFX 2302 N 1
SFX 2302 lať elieme .
SFX 2303 N 1
SFX 2303 lať eliete .
SFX 2304 N 1
SFX 2304 lať elú .
SFX 2305 N 1
SFX 2305 lať eľ .
SFX 2306 N 1
SFX 2306 lať eľme .
SFX 2307 N 1
SFX 2307 lať eľte .
SFX 2308 N 1
SFX 2308 lať elúc .
SFX 2309 Y 1
SFX 2309 ko šie .
PFX 2309 Y 1
PFX 2309 na nanaj .
SFX 2310 N 1
SFX 2310 iasť asiem .
SFX 2311 N 1
SFX 2311 iasť asieš .
SFX 2312 N 1
SFX 2312 iasť asie .
SFX 2313 N 1
SFX 2313 iasť asieme .
SFX 2314 N 1
SFX 2314 iasť asiete .
SFX 2315 N 1
SFX 2315 iasť asú .
SFX 2316 N 1
SFX 2316 iasť as .
SFX 2317 N 1
SFX 2317 iasť asme .
SFX 2318 N 1
SFX 2318 iasť aste .
SFX 2319 N 1
SFX 2319 iasť asúc .
SFX 2320 N 1
SFX 2320 alko álk .
SFX 2321 N 1
SFX 2321 esia ies .
SFX 2322 N 1
SFX 2322 esá ies .
SFX 2323 Y 1
SFX 2323 ať íme .
PFX 2323 Y 1
PFX 2323 ne nepo .
SFX 2324 Y 1
SFX 2324 ať íte .
PFX 2324 Y 1
PFX 2324 ne nepo .
SFX 2325 Y 1
SFX 2325 ať ia .
PFX 2325 Y 1
PFX 2325 ne nepo .
SFX 2326 Y 1
SFX 2326 ať ím .
PFX 2326 Y 1
PFX 2326 ne nepo .
SFX 2327 Y 1
SFX 2327 ať íš .
PFX 2327 Y 1
PFX 2327 ne nepo .
SFX 2328 Y 1
SFX 2328 ať í .
PFX 2328 Y 1
PFX 2328 ne nepo .
SFX 2329 N 1
SFX 2329 tať ťem .
SFX 2330 N 1
SFX 2330 tať ťeš .
SFX 2331 N 1
SFX 2331 tať ťe .
SFX 2332 N 1
SFX 2332 tať ťeme .
SFX 2333 N 1
SFX 2333 tať ťete .
SFX 2334 N 1
SFX 2334 tať ťú .
SFX 2335 N 1
SFX 2335 tať ť .
SFX 2336 N 1
SFX 2336 tať ťme .
SFX 2337 N 1
SFX 2337 tať ťte .
SFX 2338 N 1
SFX 2338 tať ťúc .
SFX 2339 N 1
SFX 2339 ebyť ieto .
SFX 2340 N 1
SFX 2340 ebyť iet .
SFX 2341 N 1
SFX 2341 byť ni .
SFX 2342 Y 1
SFX 2342 ovať ujeme .
PFX 2342 Y 1
PFX 2342 ne nepo .
SFX 2343 Y 1
SFX 2343 ovať ujete .
PFX 2343 Y 1
PFX 2343 ne nepo .
SFX 2344 Y 1
SFX 2344 ovať ujú .
PFX 2344 Y 1
PFX 2344 ne nepo .
SFX 2345 Y 1
SFX 2345 ovať ujem .
PFX 2345 Y 1
PFX 2345 ne nepo .
SFX 2346 Y 1
SFX 2346 ovať uješ .
PFX 2346 Y 1
PFX 2346 ne nepo .
SFX 2347 Y 1
SFX 2347 ovať uje .
PFX 2347 Y 1
PFX 2347 ne nepo .
SFX 2348 N 1
SFX 2348 cieť tiac .
SFX 2349 Y 1
SFX 2349 a 0 .
PFX 2349 Y 1
PFX 2349 n ni .
SFX 2350 N 1
SFX 2350 hnať poženieme .
SFX 2351 N 1
SFX 2351 hnať poženiete .
SFX 2352 N 1
SFX 2352 hnať poženú .
SFX 2353 N 1
SFX 2353 hnať poženiem .
SFX 2354 N 1
SFX 2354 hnať poženieš .
SFX 2355 N 1
SFX 2355 hnať poženie .
SFX 2356 Y 1
SFX 2356 úť ieme .
PFX 2356 Y 1
PFX 2356 ne nepo .
SFX 2357 Y 1
SFX 2357 úť iete .
PFX 2357 Y 1
PFX 2357 ne nepo .
SFX 2358 Y 1
SFX 2358 ť 0 .
PFX 2358 Y 1
PFX 2358 ne nepo .
SFX 2359 Y 1
SFX 2359 úť iem .
PFX 2359 Y 1
PFX 2359 ne nepo .
SFX 2360 Y 1
SFX 2360 úť ieš .
PFX 2360 Y 1
PFX 2360 ne nepo .
SFX 2361 Y 1
SFX 2361 úť ie .
PFX 2361 Y 1
PFX 2361 ne nepo .
SFX 2362 N 1
SFX 2362 jsť pôjdeme .
SFX 2363 N 1
SFX 2363 jsť pôjdete .
SFX 2364 N 1
SFX 2364 jsť pôjdu .
SFX 2365 N 1
SFX 2365 jsť pôjdem .
SFX 2366 N 1
SFX 2366 jsť pôjdeš .
SFX 2367 N 1
SFX 2367 jsť pôjde .
SFX 2368 N 1
SFX 2368 sť dú .
SFX 2369 N 1
SFX 2369 jsť choď .
SFX 2370 N 1
SFX 2370 jsť iď .
SFX 2371 N 1
SFX 2371 jsť poď .
SFX 2372 N 1
SFX 2372 jsť poďme .
SFX 2373 N 1
SFX 2373 jsť choďme .
SFX 2374 N 1
SFX 2374 jsť iďme .
SFX 2375 N 1
SFX 2375 jsť iďte .
SFX 2376 N 1
SFX 2376 jsť choďte .
SFX 2377 N 1
SFX 2377 jsť poďte .
SFX 2378 N 1
SFX 2378 sť dúc .
SFX 2379 N 1
SFX 2379 jsť šiel .
SFX 2380 N 1
SFX 2380 jsť išiel .
SFX 2381 N 1
SFX 2381 jsť šla .
SFX 2382 N 1
SFX 2382 jsť išla .
SFX 2383 N 1
SFX 2383 jsť išlo .
SFX 2384 N 1
SFX 2384 jsť šlo .
SFX 2385 N 1
SFX 2385 jsť šli .
SFX 2386 N 1
SFX 2386 jsť išli .
SFX 2387 Y 1
SFX 2387 úť eme .
PFX 2387 Y 1
PFX 2387 ne nepo .
SFX 2388 Y 1
SFX 2388 úť ete .
PFX 2388 Y 1
PFX 2388 ne nepo .
SFX 2389 Y 1
SFX 2389 úť em .
PFX 2389 Y 1
PFX 2389 ne nepo .
SFX 2390 Y 1
SFX 2390 úť eš .
PFX 2390 Y 1
PFX 2390 ne nepo .
SFX 2391 Y 1
SFX 2391 úť e .
PFX 2391 Y 1
PFX 2391 ne nepo .
